Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRUNK HIGHWAY 95 INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin $2,750,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Cambridge for infrastructure improvements, including but not limited to traffic signals, street lighting, storm sewers, retention ponds, sanitary sewers, and water mains, on and along the marked Trunk Highway 95 reconstruction project in the city of Cambridge. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin RAILROAD TRACK RELOCATION.new text end new text begin $1,280,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Cambridge for preliminary engineering, final design, and construction of a project to relocate and improve the Burlington Northern Santa Fe railroad track at its intersection with marked Trunk Highway 95 in the city of Cambridge. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin BOND SALE AUTHORIZATION.new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in sections 1 and 2 from the bond proceeds account, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,030,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective the day following final enactment. new text end